Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1,108
Insurance policy; applicability; company; Attorney General; Risk Manager; cooperate.

Whenever a claim or suit against the state is covered by workers' compensation insurance, the provisions of the insurance policy on defense and settlement shall be applicable notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of sections 48-192 to 48-1,109. The Attorney General and the Risk Manager shall cooperate with the insurance company.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 17;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 134;

Laws 2019, LB418, § 7.